Connecticut, session 2026, HB05338.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 16-247e of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (a) [In order to] To ensure the universal availability of affordable,
5 high quality telecommunications services to all residents and businesses
6 throughout the state regardless of income, disability or location, the
7 authority shall (1) periodically investigate and determine, after notice
8 and hearing, local service options, including the definition and
9 components of any basic telecommunications services, necessary to
10 achieve universal service and meet customer needs; and (2) establish
11 lifeline and telecommunications relay service programs funded by all
12 telecommunications [carriers] service providers that provide intrastate
13 telecommunications services, as such terms are defined in 47 USC 153,
HB5338 / File No. 384 1

HB5338 File No. 384
14 as amended from time to time, sufficient to provide low-income
15 households or individuals, or persons who are hard of hearing or speech
16 impaired, with a level of telecommunications service or package of
17 telecommunications services that supports participation in the economy
18 and society of the state. The authority shall apportion the funding for
19 the lifeline and telecommunications relay service programs among
20 telecommunications [carriers] service providers on an equitable basis
21 based on the gross revenues of each telecommunications [carrier]
22 service provider that are generated in [Connecticut] the state, [both]
23 whether based on interstate [and] or intrastate services. The lifeline and
24 telecommunications relay service programs shall be administered by an
25 entity authorized, and subject to oversight, by the authority. The
26 authority shall determine by order any telecommunications service
27 provider eligible to provide benefits pursuant to the lifeline program
28 and which customers qualify for [the lifeline] benefits pursuant to such
29 program. Recipients of lifeline funds shall use such funds to pay for
30 telecommunications services provided by [any] a telecommunications
31 [carrier] service provider.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 16-247e(a)
ET Joint Favorable
HB5338 / File No. 384 2

HB5338 File No. 384
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various minor and technical changes to the Public
Utilities Regulatory Authority's statutes and does not result in a fiscal
impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5338 / File No. 384 3

HB5338 File No. 384
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5338
AN ACT CONCERNING THE DESIGNATION OF CERTAIN SERVICE
PROVIDERS FOR PURPOSES OF THE FEDERAL LIFELINE
SERVICE BENEFITS.